California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds, or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of such bonds or (b) the interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this article for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130435.

(a) The commission may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this article, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any moneys of the commission
 available therefor, including the revenues from the retail transactions and use taxes imposed pursuant to this article. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the commission in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the commission has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions,
 conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the commission authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130440.

Any bonds which shall be issued under the provisions of this article shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this article, and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used
 as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the bonds issued under this article may be so used. The provisions of this article shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130441.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this article or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130442.

If the measure to adopt the transaction and use tax pursuant to Section 130401 is not submitted to the electors on or before December 31, 1985, then this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1986, and as of that date is repealed unless a later enacted statute, which is chaptered before January 1, 1986, repeals or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.   Note: Article 9 (commencing with Section 130400) was not repealed as provided in this section because the conditions failed.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Regional Transit Services Program [130450. - 130455.]

130450.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Commissions” means the county transportation commissions of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino Counties. 

(b) “Region” means the multicounty region within the collective jurisdiction of the four commissions. 

(c) “Regional transit service” means each existing and planned public transit service, including those which are privately owned and which either receive public funds or are operated under an agreement pursuant to Section 143 of the Streets and Highways Code, whether provided by rail or bus, which operates or is planned for operation between two or more counties within the region.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 137.   Section operative on date prescribed in Section 130455.)
-------------------------------------------

130451.

(a) The commissions shall jointly develop an implementation program for regional transit services. In developing the program, the commissions shall consult with the Southern California Association of Governments, the California Transportation Commission, the Los Angeles-San Diego Rail Corridor Agency, and the South Coast Air Quality Management District.

(b) The program shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A system plan and map of all regional transit services.

(2) An implementation plan and schedule to establish each regional transit service not already in existence, including, if appropriate, a schedule of necessary construction and procurement.

(3) A policy and implementation plan for the coordination of technologies, fares, and schedules to maximize the ability and convenience of passengers to transfer among regional transit services and to and from other publicly owned or privately owned mass transit services in each county connecting to the regional transit services.

(4) A program for the operation of regional transit services to provide as efficient and convenient a service as is appropriate.

(c) The program shall consider the specialized transportation needs of elderly and handicapped persons.

(d) The program shall be consistent with and implement the adopted regional transportation plan for the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   Effective May 25, 1990.   Section operative on date prescribed in Section 130455.)
-------------------------------------------

130452.

The commissions shall hold a joint public hearing in each county in their jurisdiction on the draft program no earlier than 30 days after the draft has been completed. Following the public hearings, each commission shall adopt the regional transit services program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 138.   Section operative on date prescribed in Section 130455.)
-------------------------------------------

130453.

The initial regional transit services draft program shall be completed by December 1, 1990. The initial program need not reflect intercounty bus services. The commissions shall, in accordance with this article, prepare, adopt, and implement a revised regional transit services program every two years. Revisions to the program shall include both intercounty rail and bus services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   Effective May 25, 1990.   Section operative on date prescribed in Section 130455.)
-------------------------------------------

130454.

The adopted program shall serve as the basis for a coordinated application submitted by the commissions for funds allocated by the California Transportation Commission. Nothing in this article precludes a commission from applying for funding prior to the adoption of the initial program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   Effective May 25, 1990.   Section operative on date prescribed in Section 130455.)
-------------------------------------------

130455.

This article shall become operative only if the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission, the Orange County Transportation Commission, the Riverside County Transportation Commission, and the San Bernardino County Transportation Commission, each adopt a resolution making this article applicable to it, in which case the operative date of this article shall be the date upon which the latest of those resolutions is adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   Effective May 25, 1990.   Note: This section provides for contingent operation of Article 10, commencing with Section 130450.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Los Angeles County Transportation Commission Revenue Bond Act [130500. - 130553.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [130500. - 130502.]

130500.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission Revenue Bond Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130501.

The Legislature finds that alternative methods of financing provided in this chapter are needed to finance the cost of acquiring, constructing, and developing facilities for transit systems in the County of Los Angeles and that these methods will increase economic opportunities, contribute to economic development, be in the public interest and serve a public purpose, and promote the health, safety, and welfare of citizens within the County of Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130502.

It is the purpose of this chapter to carry out and make effective the findings of the Legislature and, to that end, to provide an alternative method of financing in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities to be used as part of transit systems, all to the mutual benefit of the people of the County of Los Angeles and to protect their health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [130510. - 130519.]

130510.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130511.

“Bonds” means indebtedness and securities of any kind or class, including bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, and other obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130512.

“Commission” means the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission created pursuant to Section 130050 and any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred upon the commission by this division is granted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130513.

“Cost,” as applied to a project or portion thereof financed under this chapter, means all or any part of the cost of construction and acquisition of all real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project, the cost of demolishing or removing any structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any land to which the structures may be removed, the cost of all machinery and equipment, vehicles, rolling stock, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period after completion of construction as determined by the commission, provisions for working capital, reserves for principal and interest, and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements, the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, and legal services, plans, specifications, estimates, and administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to the determination of the feasibility of constructing any project or incidental to the construction, acquisition, or financing of any project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130514.

“Notes” means notes and agreements relating thereto, bond anticipation notes, and commercial paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130515.

“Transit project” or “project” means real and personal property, including, but not limited to, land, structures and all improvements thereto, works, vehicles, rolling stock, rights-of-way, easements, rail lines, rail beds, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking facilities, other facilities adjacent to or nearby rail transit stations which are designed to be used in conjunction with the station, and any and all other facilities or equipment necessary or convenient for the provision of transit service, whether under, on, or above the ground, including public streets, highways, bridges, or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130516.

“Public agency” means any state agency, department, board, or commission, any county, city, regional agency, district, or other political subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130517.

“Public transit purposes,” as used in this chapter and in Section 130354, includes a pledge of transactions and use tax revenues to secure any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, the payment or provision for payment of the principal of the bonds and any premium, interest on the bonds, and the costs of issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130518.

“Revenues” means all rents, receipts, purchase payments, and all other income or receipts derived by the commission, whether from fares, the sale, lease, or other disposition of transit facilities or projects or otherwise, and any income or revenue derived from the investment of any money in any fund or account of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130519.

(a) The “Los Angeles Metro Rail project” means an 18.6 mile rail line and necessary support facilities and equipment as described in the June 1983 Environmental Impact Statement and Environmental Report, Los Angeles Rail Rapid Transit Project, Metro Rail.

(b) The ”initial segment of the Los Angeles Metro Rail project” means that portion of the project which the United States Department of Transportation has approved and committed federal funds for initial construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Powers and Duties [130520. - 130522.]

130520.

The commission may incur indebtedness and obligations as provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130521.

The commission may acquire by deed, purchase, lease, contract, gift, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal property, structures, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, air, land, and development rights, and other interests in lands located within this state necessary or convenient for the construction or operation of a project, upon terms and conditions it deems advisable, and to lease, develop, jointly develop, maintain, operate, or dispose of any property, right, or interest in the manner that is necessary or desirable to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter provides eminent domain power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130522.

The commission may do all of the following:

(a) Fix, collect, and revise from time to time, rates, rents, fees, fares, and charges for the use of, and for any facilities furnished or to be furnished by, a project or any part thereof, except that no rent, fee, fare, or charge may be imposed on an operator for the use of the facilities used in the operation of its transit guideway system.

(b) Contract with any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or public agency with respect to a project.

(c) Provide and maintain, by contract with any public agency or otherwise, a security force to enforce its regulations, preserve and protect the projects financed pursuant to this chapter, and preserve and protect the public peace, health, and safety with respect to these projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds and Notes [130530. - 130545.]

130530.

The commission may issue bonds for purposes authorized by this chapter, and to fund or refund them, pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130531.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) The commission and its revenues are exempt from all taxes on, or measured by, income.

(b) Bonds issued by the commission are exempt from all property taxation, and the interest on the bonds are exempt from all taxes on income.

(c) All property owned by the commission is exempt from property taxes, assessments, and other public charges secured by liens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130532.

The commission may from time to time issue or renew notes in anticipation of the sale of bonds or otherwise. The commission may also issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge any other outstanding obligation and partly for any other purpose. Notes may be authorized, sold, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. Any resolution of the commission authorizing notes may contain any provision which the commission may include in any resolution authorizing bonds, and the commission may include in the notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it may include in bonds. Notes shall be paid from any revenues of the commission or other money available therefor and not otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued, subject to any contractual rights of the holders of any outstanding notes or other obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130533.

(a) Except as provided in this subdivision and as may be otherwise expressly provided by the commission, all issues of its bonds are special obligations of the commission payable from any revenues or money of the commission available therefor and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any agreement with the holders of particular bonds pledging any particular revenues or money. However, the commission may not pledge revenues or money from the following sources: federal funds provided under Sections 1602 and 1607a of Title 49 of the United States Code, funds allocated pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 99312 from a state transit assistance fund created pursuant to Section 99313.6, funds allocated from the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund, funds subject to Article XIX of the California Constitution, and funds provided pursuant to the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10).

(b) The commission may not pledge any of its revenue derived from the retail transactions and use tax which have been allocated to a city pursuant to the ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 130350, unless the city has authorized the pledging of its allocation.

(c) Notwithstanding that the bonds may be payable from a special fund, they are for all purposes negotiable instruments, subject only to the provisions of the bonds for registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130534.

(a) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds, or the commission, in its discretion, may issue bonds of both types.

(b) The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the commission and shall bear the date or dates, mature at the time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates, bear interest at the rate or rates, be payable at the time or times, be in the denominations, be in registered form, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption, as the resolution or resolutions may provide.

(c) The bonds may be sold at public or private sale, and for the price or prices and on the terms and conditions as determined by the commission.

(d) Pending preparation of the bonds, the commission may issue interim receipts, certificates, or temporary bonds which shall be exchanged for the bonds. The commission may sell any bonds at a price below the par value thereof without any limitation on price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130535.

(a) At times that the commission desires to issue bonds, it shall adopt a resolution specifying the total amount of bonds proposed to be issued.

(b) Any resolution authorizing any bonds, or any issue of bonds, shall, to the extent applicable, contain provisions, which are a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds to be authorized, as to the following:

(1) Pledging all or any part of the revenues of any project or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the commission with any individual, partnership, corporation, or association or other body, public or private, or other money of the commission, to secure the payment of the bonds or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to any agreement with bondholders that may then exist.

(2) The rentals, fees, fares, purchase payments, and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition of the revenues.

(3) The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation and disposition thereof.

(4) Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or any issue of the bonds.

(5) Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

(6) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds that the holders of which are required to consent thereto, and the manner in which the consent may be given. 

(7) Limitations on expenditures for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the commission.

(8) Defining the acts or omissions to act which constitute a default in the duties of the commission to bondholders of the commission’s obligations, and providing the rights and remedies of the bondholders in the event of a default.

(9) The mortgaging of any project, or any part thereof, for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(10) The terms and conditions of the sale, whether public or private, including, but not limited to, the price, interest rates, terms to maturity, security arrangements, and any other terms and conditions which the commission deems necessary under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130536.

Neither the members of the commission, nor any person executing the bonds, are liable personally on the bonds, or are subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130537.

The commission may, from any funds available therefor, purchase its bonds. The commission may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell the bonds, subject to, and in accordance with, agreements with the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130538.

(a) At the discretion of the commission, any bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the commission and a trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state.

(b) The trust agreement, or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds, may pledge or assign the revenues to be received or the proceeds of any contract pledged and may convey or mortgage the project, or any portion thereof, to be financed out of the proceeds of the bonds. The trust agreement, or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds, may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including particularly provisions specifically authorized to be included in any resolution of the commission authorizing bonds.

(c) Any bank or trust company which does business under the laws of the United States or of this state, which has its principal place of business in this state, and which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities as may be required by the commission.

(d) Any trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition, any trust agreement or resolution may contain other provisions that the commission may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130538.5.

The commission shall take no action which will materially impair the security pledged for any bonds which it has previously issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130539.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130540.

(a) Bonds issued under this chapter do not constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any other public agency, other than the commission, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any other public agency, other than the commission, but shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefor. All the bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect:
“Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California or any public agency, other than the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission, is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.”(b) The issuance of bonds under this chapter does not in any manner obligate the state or any other public agency thereof to levy, or to pledge any form of, taxation therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130541.

The commission may provide for the issuance of bonds of the commission for the purpose of refunding any bond then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of the bonds and, if deemed advisable by the commission, for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a project or any portion thereof. The commission may issue refunding bonds to refinance its indebtedness only if the commission finds that the refunding is in the public interest due to the terms or conditions of the refunding, including, without limitation, lower net interest cost, maturity or maturities, call provisions, or similar terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130542.

(a) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds may, in the discretion of the commission, be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or retirement at the maturity thereof and may, pending such application, be placed in escrow to be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on the date as may be determined by the commission.

(b) Pending that use, the escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested by the commission or its trustee in obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, maturing at a time or times appropriate to ensure the prompt payment of principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the commission for use by it in any lawful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130543.

The proceeds of any bonds issued for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions, or enlargements of a project may be invested and reinvested by the commission or its trustee in obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States of America, maturing not later than the time or times when the proceeds will be needed for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investment may be applied to the payment of all or any part of the cost or may be used by the commission in any lawful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130544.

Bonds issued pursuant to Section 130542 are subject to this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as other bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130545.

The bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, commercial or savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, and investment companies, for executors, administrators, guardians, conservators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, and for any funds which may be invested in county, municipal, or school district bonds. The bonds are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer or any public agency for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state is now, or may hereafter be, authorized by law, including deposits to secure public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Supplemental Provisions [130550. - 130553.]

130550.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130551.

(a) This chapter provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby, and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

(b) The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130552.

The State of California does hereby pledge to, and agree with, the holders of any bonds issued under this chapter and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the commission pursuant to this chapter that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the commission until the bonds, together with the interest thereon, are fully met and discharged and the contracts are fully performed on the part of the commission. However, nothing in this section precludes that limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision has been made by law for the protection of the bondholder or those entering into contracts with the commission.

The commission, as agent for the state for this purpose only, may include this pledge and undertaking for the state in issuing its bonds and entering into contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130553.

To the extent that the provisions of this chapter, with respect to the financing of transit systems or facilities, are inconsistent with the provisions of any general statute or special act or parts thereof, with respect to the financing of transit systems or facilities, the provisions of this chapter are controlling. This section does not affect the authority of the Southern California Rapid Transit District to issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30900) of Part 3 of Division 10 or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1646, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Code of Conduct for the Board of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority [130600. - 130730.]

130600.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Board” means the board of directors of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(b) “Board staff” or “staff” has the same meaning as the term “board staff,” as defined in MTA’s administrative code.

(c) “Gift” has the same meaning as defined in Section 82028 of the Government Code.

(d) “Lobbyist,” “lobbyist employer,” and “lobbying firm,” have the same meanings as defined in Section 130051.18.

(e) “MTA” means the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(f) “MTA contractor” has the same meaning as defined in MTA’s administrative code.

(g) “MTA employee” has the same meaning as defined in MTA’s administrative code.

(h) “MTA proposer” has the same meaning as defined in MTA’s administrative code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 6.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130605.

Any reference in this chapter to “chief executive officer,” “general counsel,” “counsel,” “inspector general,” “ethics officer,” “board secretary,” or “secretary” is to the officers of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority appointed under Sections 130051.9, 130051.28, and 130610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 7.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130607.

(a) This chapter, in addition to rules or codes adopted by the board, shall be the code of conduct for the board of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(b) In addition to any other ethics laws applicable to other public officials, members of the board are also subject to the rules and codes described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 8.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130610.

(a) The board shall appoint an ethics officer, who shall report to the board and operate in an independent manner.

(b) When in doubt as to the applicability of any provision of this chapter to any particular situation, a board member shall contact the general counsel or the ethics officer for advice.

(c) (1) The ethics officer shall interpret relevant authorities and provide advice to the board and MTA relating to codes of conduct, lobbying, governmental ethics, campaign finance, fair procurement practices, and conflicts of interest.

(2) Any advice provided by the ethics officer shall be confidential and entitled to all applicable privileges.

(d) The ethics officer shall propose amendments to codes of conduct that apply to the board, MTA employees, and MTA contractors, when appropriate. The proposed amendments are subject to approval by the board.

(e) (1) The inspector general shall receive any allegation of a violation of this chapter, or other ethics-related rules or laws that apply to the board and MTA.

(2) The inspector general may confer with the ethics officer on any potential violations described in paragraph (1) that may be a violation of this chapter, or other ethics-related rules or laws that apply to the
 board and MTA.

(3) The ethics officer may make recommendations regarding a potential violation described in paragraph (1) for consideration by the inspector general.

(f) The ethics officer shall be removed from office only if either or both of the following occur:

(1) A two-thirds majority of the members of the board votes for removal.

(2) The ethics officer violates a federal or state law or regulation, a local ordinance, or a policy or practice of the authority, relative to ethical practices, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of gifts or contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 755, Sec. 9.   (AB 3123)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

130615.

(a) This chapter shall be enforced by the inspector general.

(b) Any violation of this chapter that is also a violation of other state law or of local or federal law may also be prosecuted by the appropriate authority.

(c) Upon notice of a possible violation of this chapter, the board shall refer the matter to the inspector general for investigation. Upon completion of the investigation, if the matter has been determined not to be criminal in nature and to be of such a nature that it may be disclosed, the inspector general shall report the findings to the board. If the matter is
 determined to be criminal in nature, the inspector general shall refer the matter to the appropriate enforcement authorities for prosecution.
